Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 3
HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES
FOR THE ELDERLY, BLIND, AND DISABLED

25.5-6-301. Short title.

This part 3 shall be known and may be cited as the "Home- and Community-based Services for the Elderly, Blind, and Disabled Act".

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1937, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-601 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-302. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that it is the purpose of this part 3 to provide, under a federal waiver of statutory requirements, for an array of home- and community-based services to eligible elderly, blind, and disabled individuals as an alternative to nursing facility placement.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1937, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-602 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-303. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Adult day care facility" means a facility which meets all applicable state and federal requirements and is certified by the state to provide adult day care services to eligible persons.

"Adult day care services" means health and social services provided on a less than twenty-four-hour basis to eligible persons in state-certified adult day care facilities.

"Alternative care facility" means a residential facility which provides alternative care services and protective oversight to eligible persons, which meets applicable state and federal requirements, and which is state-certified.

"Alternative care services" means a package of personal care and homemaker services provided in a state-certified alternative care facility.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (5) is effective until July 1, 2024.]

"Case management agency" means agencies providing services on and before July 1, 1995, for home- and community-based programs for the elderly, blind, and disabled shall be terminated July 1, 1995, and case management functions shall thereafter be performed in accordance with this article 6.

"Case management agency", for counties participating in the single entry point system pursuant to this article before July 1, 1995, and for all counties on and after said date, means a public or private, nonprofit or for profit agency that meets all applicable state and federal requirements and is certified by the state department to provide case management functions reimbursable under this article and articles 4 and 5 of this title, within a geographic area of the state consisting of one or more counties. Such functions shall be provided by the agency under a contract executed with the state department or other state designated agency. The state department shall establish procedures for the designation, certification, and decertification of case management agencies and requirements for performance and staffing of the agencies. Such procedures and requirements shall be set forth in rules promulgated by the state board or shall be included in the contracts executed by the state department.

(5) [Editor's note: This version of subsection (5) is effective July 1, 2024.]

(a) "Case management agency" means agencies providing services on and before July 1, 1995, for home- and community-based programs for the elderly, blind, and disabled shall be terminated July 1, 1995, and case management functions shall thereafter be performed in accordance with this article 6.

(b) "Case management agency" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-6-1702 (2).

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (6) is effective until July 1, 2024.] "Case management services" means functions performed by a case management agency, including: The assessment of a client's needs, the development and implementation of a case plan for the client, the coordination and monitoring of service delivery, the direct delivery of services as provided by parts 3 to 12 of this article or by rules adopted by the state board, the evaluation of service effectiveness, and the reassessment of the client's needs. Case management services shall be reimbursed as an administrative expense.

(6)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (6) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

"Case management services" has the same meeting as set forth in section 25.5-6-1702 (3).

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (7) is effective until July 1, 2024.] "Case plan" means a coordinated plan for the provision of long-term-care services in a setting other than a nursing home, developed and managed by a case management agency, in coordination with the client, his family or guardian and physician, and other providers of care.

(7)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (7) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

"Case plan" means a coordinated plan for the provision of long-term-care services in a setting other than a nursing home, developed and managed by a case management agency, in coordination with the client, the client's family or guardian, the client's physician, and other providers of care.

"Electronic monitoring provider" means an entity that meets applicable state, federal, and local requirements and is certified to provide electronic monitoring services.

"Electronic monitoring services" means electronic equipment or adaptations or other remote supports that are related to an eligible person's disability and enable the person to remain at home.

"Homemaker agency" means any agency that meets applicable state and federal requirements and is state-certified to provide homemaker services.

"Homemaker services" means general household activities that are provided by state-certified agencies to maintain a healthy and safe home environment for eligible persons.

"Home modification provider" means an entity that meets applicable state, federal, and local requirements and is certified to provide home modification services.

"Home modification services" means home installations or adaptations that are related to the eligible person's physical impairment and enable the person to remain at home.

"Medications administration" means the administration or monitoring of medications provided in a manner consistent with part 3 of article 1.5 of title 25, C.R.S., under the authority and direction of the state department, as part of the "alternative care services", as defined in subsection (4) of this section, as provided in an "alternative care facility", as defined in subsection (3) of this section.

"Nonmedical transportation provider" means an entity that meets applicable state and federal requirements and is certified to provide nonmedical transportation services.

"Nonmedical transportation services" means transportation of eligible persons to services such as, but not limited to, adult day care services, which enable the person to remain at home.

"Personal care agency" means any agency that meets state and federal requirements and is state-certified to provide personal care services.

"Personal care services" means services to meet an eligible person's physical requirements and functional needs, when such services do not require the supervision of a nurse.

"Respite care provider" means a facility or agency that meets all applicable state and federal requirements and is state-certified to provide respite care services.

"Respite care services" means services of a short-term nature provided to a client, in the home or in a facility approved by the state department, in order to temporarily relieve the family or other home providers from the care and maintenance of such client, including room and board, maintenance, personal care, and other related services.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1938, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(21) amended, (SB 15-240), ch. 139, p. 423, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(21) amended, (SB 16-093), ch. 54, p. 132, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

IP amended and (21) repealed, (HB 18-1326), ch. 183, p. 1239, § 2, effective July 1; IP and (5)(a) amended, (SB 18-093), ch. 62, p. 610, § 7, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(9) amended, (SB 21-210), ch. 78, p. 303, § 1, effective April 30; (5), (6), and (7) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 333, § 30, effective July 1, 2024.

25.5-6-304. Administration.

The provisions of this part 3 shall be administered by the state department.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1940, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-604 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-305. Provision of services for elderly and blind individuals and individuals with disabilities.

The provision of the services set forth in this part 3 shall be subject to the availability of federal matching medicaid funds, pursuant to Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, for payment of the costs for administration and costs for the provision of such services.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1940, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-605 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-306. Eligible groups.

Home- and community-based services under this part 3 shall be offered only to persons:

Who are elderly, blind, or physically disabled; and

Who are in need of the level of care available in a nursing home; and

Who are categorically eligible for medical assistance, or whose gross income does not exceed three hundred percent of the current federal supplemental security income benefit level, and whose resources do not exceed the limit established for individuals receiving a mandatory minimum state supplementation of supplemental security income benefits or, in the case of a person who is married, do not exceed the amount authorized in section 25.5-6-101.

A long-term-care eligible person receiving home- and community-based services shall remain eligible for the services specified in sections 25.5-5-102, 25.5-5-103, 25.5-5-202, and 25.5-5-203, as applicable.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1940, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-606 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-307. Services for the elderly, blind, and disabled.

Subject to the provisions of this part 3, home- and community-based services for the elderly, blind, and disabled include only the following services:

Adult day care;

Alternative care services;

Electronic monitoring services;

Home modification services;

Homemaker services;

Nonmedical transportation services;

Personal care services;

Respite care services;

Repealed.

Services provided under the consumer-directed care service model, part 11 of this article;

In-home support services provided pursuant to part 12 of this article.

All providers of home- and community-based services for the elderly, blind, and disabled may be separately certified to provide other services, if otherwise qualified.

A case management agency may be certified to provide the services described in subsection (1) of this section, if otherwise qualified as a provider under the state medical assistance program.

The case management agency, in coordination with the eligible person, the person's family or guardian, and the person's physician, shall include in each case plan a process by which the eligible person may receive necessary care, which may include respite care, if the eligible person's family or service provider is unavailable due to an emergency situation or to unforeseen circumstances. The eligible person and the person's family or guardian shall be duly informed by the case management agency of these alternative care provisions at the time the case plan is initiated.

The requirements of this subsection (4) shall not apply if the eligible person is residing in an alternative care facility.

No later than January 2024, the state department shall submit a report to the senate health and human services committee, the house of representatives public and behavioral health and human services committee, and the house of representatives health and insurance committee, or any successor committees, as part of its "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" presentation required by section 2-7-203. At a minimum, the report must identify:

A reimbursement system with a goal to incentivize and increase transportation provider participation;

How the state department will ensure compliance with applicable federal laws and waiver requirements;

A system of common reporting to ensure a recipient does not exceed the medicaid benefit in a multi-provider scenario; and

Best practices based on what other states have done to allow transportation network companies to provide nonmedical transportation services for individuals receiving services, including but not limited to, reimbursement rates; driver compensation; and integration with programs that provide nonmedical transportation services.

In developing the report, the state department shall engage in a stakeholder process that includes individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities and their families, individuals with disabilities, and transportation network companies. The report may be developed in conjunction with the reporting requirement in sections 25.5-6-409 (6), 25.5-6-606 (9), 25.5-6-704 (8), and 25.5-6-1303 (9).

Upon completion of the report described in subsection (5)(a) of this section, the state department shall analyze and review each operational transportation network company, as defined in section 40-10.1-602 (3). The state department shall verify each transportation network company's viability to ensure the health, safety, welfare, cost effectiveness, and capability in expanding nonmedical transportation services for individuals receiving services pursuant to this section and comply with all rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (5)(e)(I) of this section.

No later than July 1, 2024, the state department shall authorize verified transportation network companies to provide nonmedical transportation services if the state department finds the transportation network company viable under federal requirements and within budgetary constraints.

For the purposes of this subsection (5)(c), "verify" means a transportation network company meets all requirements resulting from the report described in subsection (5)(a) of this section.

The state department may seek any necessary federal authorization for the implementation of this subsection (5).

The state department shall promulgate any necessary rules to ensure transportation network companies comply with federal and state oversight requirements and shall include all relevant stakeholders, including medicaid recipients, transportation network companies, current providers and drivers for nonmedical transportation services, and other interested parties in the development of such requirements.

Pursuant to section 40-10.1-105 (1)(l), transportation network companies are not subject to regulation by the public utilities commission when providing nonmedical transportation services pursuant to this section and are instead subject to rules promulgated by the state department pursuant to this subsection (5)(e).

This subsection (5) does not apply to a provider authorized to provide transportation services pursuant to part 8 of article 1 of title 25.5 prior to August 10, 2022.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1940, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

IP(1) amended and (1)(k) added, (HB 14-1357), ch. 254, p. 1015, § 4, effective March 1, 2015.

L. 2018:

(1)(i) repealed, (HB 18-1326), ch. 183, p. 1240, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

(5) added, (HB 22-1114), ch. 396, p. 2815, § 2, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-607 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1114, see section 1 of chapter 396, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

25.5-6-308. Cost of services.

Home- and community-based services for the elderly, blind, and disabled shall meet aggregate federal waiver budget neutrality requirements.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1941, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-607.5 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-309. Special provisions - post-eligibility treatment of income.

Persons who receive services under this part 3 shall pay to the state department, or designated agent or provider, all income remaining after application of federally allowed maintenance and medical deductions or shall pay the cost of home- and community-based services rendered, whichever is less.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1941, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-608 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-310. Special provisions - personal care services provided by a family.

A member of an eligible person's family, other than the person's spouse, may be employed to provide personal care services to such person.

The maximum reimbursement for the services provided by a member of the person's family per year for each client shall not exceed the equivalent of four hundred forty-four service units per year for a member of the eligible person's family.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1942, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-609 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-311. Duties of state department.

The state department shall:

Seek and utilize any available federal, state, or private funds which are available for carrying out the purposes of this part 3, including but not limited to medicaid funds, pursuant to Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended;

Provide a system for reimbursement for services provided pursuant to this part 3, which system shall encourage cost containment.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1942, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-610 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-312. Gifts - grants.

The state department, acting for and on behalf of the state, may receive and accept title to any grant or gift from any source, including the federal government, and all grants, grants-in-aid, and gifts shall be deposited with the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the general fund, and such moneys shall be appropriated to the state department to carry out the purposes of this article and articles 4 and 5 of this title.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1942, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-611 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-313. Rules - federal authorization.

Pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., the state board shall adopt rules for the administration of this part 3.

(1.5) The rules adopted by the state board pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall include the following provisions concerning adult day care facilities:

A definition of a restricted environment and a restrictive egress alert device;

Parameters governing how the restrictive egress alert device shall be used and tested and the staff roles regarding the use and oversight of the device; and

Parameters governing a restricted environment, including but not limited to staffing and training requirements; appropriateness of placement; assessment; participant's rights; records and reporting requirements; building requirements including grounds and fire safety; restrictive egress alert systems and devices; fencing or other enclosures; and the application process to offer a restricted environment.

The state department is authorized to seek any necessary federal authorization to implement the provisions of this part 3.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1942, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1.5) added, (HB 10-1053), ch. 276, p. 1267, § 4, effective May 26.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-612 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2010 act adding subsection (1.5), see section 1 of chapter 1267, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

25.5-6-314. Training for staff providing direct-care services to clients with dementia - rules - definitions.

As used in this section:

"Covered facility" means a nursing care facility or an assisted living residence licensed by the department of public health and environment pursuant to section 25-1.5-103 (1)(a).

"Dementia diseases and related disabilities" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25-1-502 (2.5).

"Direct-care staff member" means a staff member caring for the physical, emotional, or mental health needs of clients of an adult day care facility and whose work involves regular contact with clients who are living with dementia diseases and related disabilities.

"Staff member" means an individual, other than a volunteer, who is employed by an adult day care facility.

By July 1, 2024, the state board shall adopt rules requiring all direct-care staff members to obtain dementia training pursuant to curriculum prescribed or approved by the state department in collaboration with stakeholders that is consistent with the rules adopted pursuant to this subsection (2). The rules must specify the following, at a minimum:

The date on which the dementia training requirement is effective;

The length and frequency of the dementia training, which must be competency-based and must require all direct-care staff to obtain:

At least four hours of initial dementia training, which must be completed as follows:

For all direct-care staff members hired by or who start providing direct-care services at an adult day care facility on or after the effective date of the dementia training requirement specified in the rules, unless an exception established pursuant to subsection (2)(e) of this section applies, the training must be completed within one hundred twenty days after the start of employment or the provision of direct-care services, as applicable; and

For all direct-care staff members hired by or providing direct-care services at an adult day care facility before the effective date of the dementia training requirement specified in the rules, unless an exception established pursuant to subsection (2)(e) of this section applies, the training must be completed within one hundred twenty days after the effective date of the dementia training requirement specified in the rules; and

At least two hours of continuing education on dementia topics every two years. The continuing education must include current information on best practices in the treatment and care of persons living with dementia diseases and related disabilities.

The content of the initial dementia training, which must be culturally competent and include the following topics:

Dementia diseases and related disabilities;

Person-centered care;

Care planning;

Activities of daily living; and

Dementia-related behaviors and communication;

The method of demonstrating completion of the required dementia training and continuing education and of exempting a direct-care staff member from the required dementia training if the direct-care staff member moves to a different adult day care facility than the adult day care facility through which the direct-care staff member received the training or moves to a covered facility after receiving the training through an adult day care facility;

An exception to the initial dementia training requirements for:

A direct-care staff member hired by or who starts providing direct-care services at an adult day care facility on or after the effective date of the dementia training requirement specified in the rules who has:

Completed an equivalent dementia training program within the twenty-four months immediately preceding the effective date of the dementia training requirement specified in the rules; and

Provided proof of satisfactory completion of the training program; and

A direct-care staff member hired by or providing direct-care services at an adult day care facility before the effective date of the dementia training requirement specified in the rules who has:

Received equivalent training, as defined in the rules, within the twenty-four months immediately preceding the effective date of the dementia training requirement specified in the rules; and

Provided proof of satisfactory completion of the training program;

Minimum requirements for individuals conducting the dementia training;

A process for the state department to verify compliance with this section and the rules adopted by the state board pursuant to this section; and

Any other matters the state board deems necessary to implement this section.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (SB 22-079), ch. 282, p. 2029, § 3, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 22-079, see section 1 of chapter 282, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.